Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.420

Immigration and citizenship status—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 43.330.510, 43.10.310, 43.17.425, 10.93.160, and 43.10.315, and sections 8 and 9, chapter 440, Laws of 2019 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Civil immigration warrant" means any warrant for a violation of federal civil immigration law issued by a federal immigration authority. A "civil immigration warrant" includes, but is not limited to, administrative warrants issued on forms I-200 or I-203, or their successors, and civil immigration warrants entered in the national crime information center database.

(2) "Court order" means a directive issued by a judge or magistrate under the authority of Article III of the United States Constitution or Article IV of the Washington Constitution. A "court order" includes but is not limited to warrants and subpoenas.

(3) "Federal immigration authority" means any officer, employee, or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States department of homeland security including but not limited to its subagencies, immigration and customs enforcement and customs and border protection, and any present or future divisions thereof, charged with immigration enforcement.

(4) "Health facility" has the same meaning as the term "health care facility" provided in RCW 70.175.020, and includes substance abuse treatment facilities.

(5) "Hold request" or "immigration detainer request" means a request from a federal immigration authority, without a court order, that a state or local law enforcement agency maintain custody of an individual currently in its custody beyond the time he or she would otherwise be eligible for release in order to facilitate transfer to a federal immigration authority. A "hold request" or "immigration detainer request" includes, but is not limited to, department of homeland security form I-247A or prior or subsequent versions of form I-247.

(6) "Immigration detention agreement" means any contract, agreement, intergovernmental service agreement, or memorandum of understanding that permits a state or local law enforcement agency to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations.

(7) "Immigration or citizenship status" means as such status has been established to such individual under the immigration and nationality act.

(8) "Language services" includes but is not limited to translation, interpretation, training, or classes. Translation means written communication from one language to another while preserving the intent and essential meaning of the original text. Interpretation means transfer of an oral communication from one language to another.

(9) "Local government" means any governmental entity other than the state, federal agencies, or an operating system established under chapter 43.52 RCW. It includes, but is not limited to, cities, counties, school districts, and special purpose districts.

(10) "Local law enforcement agency" means any agency of a city, county, special district, or other political subdivision of the state that is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency, as defined by RCW 10.93.020, or that is authorized to operate jails or to maintain custody of individuals in jails; or to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities; or to monitor compliance with probation or parole conditions.

(11) "Notification request" means a request from a federal immigration authority that a state or local law enforcement agency inform a federal immigration authority of the release date and time in advance of the release of an individual in its custody. "Notification request" includes, but is not limited to, the department of homeland security's form I-247A, form I-247N, or prior or subsequent versions of such forms.

(12) "Physical custody of the department of corrections" means only those individuals detained in a state correctional facility but does not include minors detained pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW, or individuals in community custody as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(13) "Public schools" means all public elementary and secondary schools under the jurisdiction of local governing boards or a charter school board and all institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(14) "School resource officer" means a commissioned law enforcement officer in the state of Washington with sworn authority to uphold the law and assigned by the employing police department or sheriff's office to work in schools to ensure school safety. By building relationships with students, school resource officers work alongside school administrators and staff to help students make good choices. School resource officers are encouraged to focus on keeping students out of the criminal justice system when possible and not impose criminal sanctions in matters that are more appropriately handled within the educational system.

(15) "State agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 42.56.010.

(16) "State law enforcement agency" means any agency of the state of Washington that:

(a) Is a general authority Washington law enforcement agency as defined by RCW 10.93.020;

(b) Is authorized to operate prisons or to maintain custody of individuals in prisons; or

(c) Is authorized to operate juvenile detention facilities or to maintain custody of individuals in juvenile detention facilities.

[ 2019 c 440 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 440: See notes following RCW 43.17.425.